fst/newadjectives.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+Adj 
+Sg 
+Pl 
+Masc 
+Fem
+Obl
+Dir
^GuessAdjectiveI
^GuessAdjectiveII

LEXICON AdjectiveI
+Adj:0                  #;

LEXICON AdjectiveII
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dir:0  #;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Dir:^े  #;
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Obl:^े  #;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Obl:^े  #;
+Adj+Fem+Sg+Dir:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Dir:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Sg+Obl:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ी   #;

LEXICON Root
अँधेरा AdjectiveII;
अंतरा AdjectiveII;
अंतरिक्षसत् AdjectiveI;
अकथनीय AdjectiveI;
अकर्ता AdjectiveII;
अकुल AdjectiveI;
अख्यात AdjectiveI;
अगुआ AdjectiveII;
अघट AdjectiveI;
अछूता AdjectiveII;
अजन AdjectiveI;
अटका AdjectiveII;
अट्ठयासी AdjectiveI;
अतर्पी AdjectiveI;
अतला AdjectiveII;
अदण्ड AdjectiveI;
अधकचरा AdjectiveII;
अधमरा AdjectiveII;
अधावट AdjectiveI;
अध्यधीन AdjectiveI;
अनकटा AdjectiveII;
अनगिना AdjectiveII;
अनच्छ AdjectiveI;
अनछुआ AdjectiveII;
अनढँका AdjectiveII;
अनपका AdjectiveII;
अनपहृत AdjectiveI;
अनबेधा AdjectiveII;
अनमिलता AdjectiveII;
अनलसित AdjectiveI;
अनसिखा AdjectiveII;
अनाढ्य AdjectiveI;
अनार्तवा AdjectiveII;
अनाहत AdjectiveI;
अनिवारित AdjectiveI;
अनुजन्मा AdjectiveII;
अनुज्ञापित AdjectiveI;
अनुभक्त AdjectiveI;
अनुशासी AdjectiveI;
अनोखा AdjectiveII;
अन्ठानबे AdjectiveI;
अन्नीय AdjectiveI;
अन्यथा AdjectiveII;
अपचेष्टित AdjectiveI;
अपरिगण्य AdjectiveI;
अपरिणीता AdjectiveII;
अपाकृत AdjectiveI;
अपृथ्वीज AdjectiveI;
अप्रत्यक्ष AdjectiveI;
अप्रासांगिक AdjectiveI;
अबरा AdjectiveII;
अबाइस्सिनियाई AdjectiveI;
अभिकांक्षित AdjectiveI;
अभिमंत्रित AdjectiveI;
अभिव्यक्त AdjectiveI;
अभोगा AdjectiveII;
अभ्यंजनीय AdjectiveI;
अमरप्रभ AdjectiveI;
अमीर AdjectiveI;
अमौआ AdjectiveII;
अयशस्कर AdjectiveI;
अरसठवाँ AdjectiveI;
अरिहा AdjectiveII;
अर्जुनक AdjectiveI;
अर्भ AdjectiveI;
अलाम AdjectiveI;
अलिया-बलिया AdjectiveII;
अल्पायु AdjectiveI;
अवदीर्ण AdjectiveI;
अवर्ण्य AdjectiveI;
अवहार्य AdjectiveI;
अविजित AdjectiveI;
अविवाहिता AdjectiveII;
अविश्वासी AdjectiveI;
अव्याप्य AdjectiveI;
अश्रव्य AdjectiveI;
असंबद्ध AdjectiveI;
असमक्ष AdjectiveI;
असामान्य AdjectiveI;
असूर्यपश्या AdjectiveII;
अस्पृष्ट AdjectiveI;
आंगिरस AdjectiveI;
आक्रन्दित AdjectiveI;
आख़ता AdjectiveII;
आचारहीन AdjectiveI;
आजादाना AdjectiveII;
आत्तलक्ष्मी AdjectiveI;
आदमखोर AdjectiveI;
आदाता AdjectiveII;
आनंदित AdjectiveI;
आभारक AdjectiveI;
आया AdjectiveII;
आरष AdjectiveI;
आलीजाह AdjectiveI;
आवारा AdjectiveII;
आशंकाहीन AdjectiveI;
आश्रय-दाता AdjectiveII;
आसीन AdjectiveI;
इंदु-वदना AdjectiveII;
इंद्रियजीत AdjectiveI;
इकलौता AdjectiveII;
इक्का AdjectiveII;
इक्यानबेवाँ AdjectiveI;
इत्तिफाकिया AdjectiveII;
इन्कारी AdjectiveI;
इस्लामी AdjectiveI;
उँजियारा AdjectiveII;
उक्ष AdjectiveI;
उगा AdjectiveII;
उच्चैःश्रवा AdjectiveII;
उजागर AdjectiveI;
उजियाला AdjectiveII;
उठा AdjectiveII;
उड़नफाख्ता AdjectiveII;
उतरहा AdjectiveII;
उत्खात AdjectiveI;
उदरीय AdjectiveI;
उधार-दाता AdjectiveII;
उन्मद AdjectiveI;
उपभोक्ता AdjectiveII;
उमर-रसीद AdjectiveI;
उलटा AdjectiveII;
ऊँचा AdjectiveII;
ऋणप्रदाता AdjectiveII;
ऋणात्मक AdjectiveI;
एकमुँहा AdjectiveII;
एकाध AdjectiveI;
ऐंठदार AdjectiveI;
ऐरा-ग़ैरा AdjectiveII;
ओला AdjectiveII;
कँवारा AdjectiveII;
कंदरावासी AdjectiveI;
कटखनहा AdjectiveII;
कटिहीना AdjectiveII;
कड़ुवा AdjectiveII;
कनेठा AdjectiveII;
कफनख़सोट AdjectiveI;
कर्कशा AdjectiveII;
कर्जदार AdjectiveI;
कलहन्तरिता AdjectiveII;
कष्टपूर्ण AdjectiveI;
काँचा AdjectiveII;
काबुली AdjectiveI;
कालाकलूटा AdjectiveII;
किनारीदार AdjectiveI;
कुनकुना AdjectiveII;
कुबुद्धि AdjectiveI;
केंद्रीय AdjectiveI;
केसरिया AdjectiveII;
कोलकतिया AdjectiveII;
क्रमानुकूल AdjectiveI;
खगोलीय AdjectiveI;
खटारा AdjectiveII;
खफा AdjectiveII;
ख़फ़ा AdjectiveII;
ख़ैरख़ाह AdjectiveI;
खासा AdjectiveII;
खुरदुरा AdjectiveII;
गँदला AdjectiveII;
गंजू AdjectiveI;
गदीला AdjectiveII;
गम्भीर AdjectiveI;
गहरा AdjectiveII;
ग़ैरमियादी AdjectiveI;
गुट्टा AdjectiveII;
गुणित AdjectiveI;
गेरुआ AdjectiveII;
गॉथिक AdjectiveI;
ग्रोनलैण्डी AdjectiveI;
घटिया AdjectiveII;
घुँघराला AdjectiveII;
चँदला AdjectiveII;
चटक AdjectiveI;
चटकीला AdjectiveII;
चमकीला AdjectiveII;
चहेता AdjectiveII;
चाटुकार AdjectiveI;
चितकबरा AdjectiveII;
चिन्मय AdjectiveI;
चिरयुवा AdjectiveII;
चुपड़ा AdjectiveII;
चोंचलेबाज AdjectiveI;
चोखा AdjectiveII;
चौथिया AdjectiveII;
छठा AdjectiveII;
छत्रधारी AdjectiveI;
छितराया AdjectiveII;
छेमंड AdjectiveI;
छोटा AdjectiveII;
जड़ीला AdjectiveII;
जन्य AdjectiveI;
जरा AdjectiveII;
जहाजी AdjectiveI;
ज़रायम-पेशा AdjectiveII;
जाग्रत AdjectiveI;
जाना-माना AdjectiveII;
जिम्मादार AdjectiveI;
जीताजागता AdjectiveII;
जेठा AdjectiveII;
जोशवाला AdjectiveII;
ज्ञानी AdjectiveI;
झबरीला AdjectiveII;
टकला AdjectiveII;
टूटा-फूटा AdjectiveII;
ठण्ढा AdjectiveII;
ठूँठा AdjectiveII;
डच AdjectiveI;
डरीला AdjectiveII;
ढबैला AdjectiveII;
तआला AdjectiveII;
तजरबेकार AdjectiveI;
तपा AdjectiveII;
तमीजदार AdjectiveI;
तराशीदा AdjectiveII;
ताँबिया AdjectiveII;
तार-तार AdjectiveI;
तिखरा AdjectiveII;
तिरछा AdjectiveII;
तीनतरफा AdjectiveII;
तीमारदार AdjectiveI;
तृषित AdjectiveI;
तेखरा AdjectiveII;
तोतला AdjectiveII;
त्रस्त AdjectiveI;
थमा AdjectiveII;
दकारादि AdjectiveI;
दबा AdjectiveII;
दरित AdjectiveI;
दला AdjectiveII;
दारुण AdjectiveI;
दिखनेवाला AdjectiveII;
दिवालिया AdjectiveII;
दीर्घ-सु-रत AdjectiveI;
दुखियारा AdjectiveII;
दुधमुँहा AdjectiveII;
दुमंजिला AdjectiveII;
दुरुस्तक AdjectiveI;
दुश्चरिता AdjectiveII;
दुहेजिया AdjectiveII;
दृढ़ AdjectiveI;
देशनिकाला AdjectiveII;
दोतर्फा AdjectiveII;
दोमहला AdjectiveII;
दोषयुक्त AdjectiveI;
द्रष्टा AdjectiveII;
धनत्तर AdjectiveI;
धवला AdjectiveII;
धारावत AdjectiveI;
धेरा AdjectiveII;
न AdjectiveI;
नकचढ़ा AdjectiveII;
नपातुला AdjectiveII;
नमकीन AdjectiveI;
नाइट्रिक AdjectiveI;
नाइस्तेमालशुदा AdjectiveII;
नामा AdjectiveII;
नाम्नी AdjectiveI;
निगंध AdjectiveI;
निचला AdjectiveII;
नियंत्रित AdjectiveI;
निराश्रित AdjectiveI;
निरोठा AdjectiveII;
निर्मोही AdjectiveI;
निश्शब्द AdjectiveI;
नीतिनिपुण AdjectiveI;
नुकरा AdjectiveII;
नौसिखिया AdjectiveII;
न्यग्रोधिक AdjectiveI;
पंचभुजा AdjectiveII;
पक्व AdjectiveI;
पचा AdjectiveII;
पत्नीभक्त AdjectiveI;
पत्नीव्रता AdjectiveII;
पनीला AdjectiveII;
परलोकवासी AdjectiveI;
परिरक्षक AdjectiveI;
पश्चस्थ AdjectiveI;
पसंदीदा AdjectiveII;
पाँचगुना AdjectiveII;
पारंगत AdjectiveI;
पाष्मा AdjectiveII;
पितरिहा AdjectiveII;
पीवर AdjectiveI;
पुण्यकर्मा AdjectiveII;
पुष्पहीन AdjectiveI;
पूजनीया AdjectiveII;
पेंचवाला AdjectiveII;
पैंतालीसवाँ AdjectiveI;
पोला AdjectiveII;
प्रकाशित AdjectiveI;
प्रतिभाशाली AdjectiveI;
प्रमुदित AdjectiveI;
प्रश्न-कर्ता AdjectiveII;
प्रस्फुट AdjectiveI;
प्रेरणात्मक AdjectiveI;
फकीराना AdjectiveII;
फलवाला AdjectiveII;
फ़लाँ AdjectiveI;
फिदा AdjectiveII;
फूला AdjectiveII;
फूहड़ AdjectiveI;
बँसीला AdjectiveII;
बकबकिया AdjectiveII;
बड़कन्ना AdjectiveII;
बड़बोल AdjectiveI;
बतरसिया AdjectiveII;
बपुरा AdjectiveII;
बरबडोसी AdjectiveI;
बर्फीला AdjectiveII;
बहुधार्मिक AdjectiveI;
बहुरंगा AdjectiveII;
बापुरा AdjectiveII;
बारहमासी AdjectiveI;
बिनब्याहा AdjectiveII;
बुँदेलखंडी AdjectiveI;
बुझा AdjectiveII;
बेकायदा AdjectiveII;
बेख़ौफ़ AdjectiveI;
बेतहाशा AdjectiveII;
बेफायदा AdjectiveII;
बेरङ्ग AdjectiveI;
बेसिंगा AdjectiveII;
बोया AdjectiveII;
बोलीविआई AdjectiveI;
भकुआ AdjectiveII;
भदौंहा AdjectiveII;
भरोसी AdjectiveI;
भाविता AdjectiveII;
भुच्च AdjectiveI;
भोंतला AdjectiveII;
मँगोल AdjectiveI;
मंजला AdjectiveII;
मजीठी AdjectiveI;
मझीला AdjectiveII;
मनमाना AdjectiveII;
मनुजोचित AdjectiveI;
मर्दानगीभरा AdjectiveII;
मसालेदार AdjectiveI;
मांजा AdjectiveII;
माकूल AdjectiveI;
मालदीवी AdjectiveI;
मुंच AdjectiveI;
मुंडा AdjectiveII;
मुमकिन AdjectiveI;
मुसम्मा AdjectiveII;
मूसरचंद AdjectiveI;
मोटा-तगड़ा AdjectiveII;
मोल्डोवाई AdjectiveI;
युक्त AdjectiveI;
रंग-बिरंगा AdjectiveII;
रक्षक AdjectiveI;
रहित AdjectiveI;
रिरिहा AdjectiveII;
रिश्वती AdjectiveI;
रेतोधा AdjectiveII;
रेफ AdjectiveI;
लंबा AdjectiveII;
लकारान्त AdjectiveI;
लदुआ AdjectiveII;
ललाम AdjectiveI;
लापता AdjectiveII;
लिपिबद्ध AdjectiveI;
लोहिया AdjectiveII;
वंशागत AdjectiveI;
वर्णित AdjectiveI;
वानरी AdjectiveI;
विखंडित AdjectiveI;
विज्ञाता AdjectiveII;
विधेयात्मक AdjectiveI;
विराजमान AdjectiveI;
विशेष AdjectiveI;
विस्थापित AdjectiveI;
वैचारिक AdjectiveI;
व्यावहृत AdjectiveI;
शप्त AdjectiveI;
शर्मीला AdjectiveII;
शाकी AdjectiveI;
शील AdjectiveI;
शोषित AdjectiveI;
संक्रमित AdjectiveI;
संग्रह-कर्ता AdjectiveII;
संस्थागत AdjectiveI;
सटा AdjectiveII;
सनसनीखेज AdjectiveI;
सम्भ्रांत AdjectiveI;
सयाना AdjectiveII;
सांग्रामिक AdjectiveI;
सादा AdjectiveII;
सिनेगलीज़ AdjectiveI;
सिला AdjectiveII;
सुनामा AdjectiveII;
सुर्ख AdjectiveI;
सूफ़ियाना AdjectiveII;
सौएक AdjectiveI;
स्वर्गवासी AdjectiveI;
हँसता AdjectiveII;
हरामज़ादा AdjectiveII;
हवालाती AdjectiveI;
